District of Columbia statutes.
31-3405

Fiduciary responsibilities.

(a)

Any director, officer, employee, or partner of a health maintenance organization who receives, collects, disburses, or invests funds in connection with the activities of such organization shall be responsible for such funds in a fiduciary relationship to the organization.

(b)

A health maintenance organization shall maintain in force a fidelity bond or fidelity insurance on such employees and officers, directors, and partners in an amount not less than $250,000 and not more than $5,000,000.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-235, § 6, 44 DCR 818
1981 Ed., § 35-4505.